Washington statutes.
RCW 43.15.065

Legislative committee on economic development and international relations—Subcommittees—Rules of procedure.

The committee shall by majority vote establish subcommittees, and prescribe rules of procedure for itself and its subcommittees which are consistent with this chapter.

[ 2020 c 114 s 21; 1985 c 467 s 18. Formerly RCW 44.52.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.